District of Columbia statutes.
16-903

Decree annulling marriage.

A decree annulling the marriage as illegal and void may be rendered on any of the grounds specified by sections 46-401.01 and 46-403 as invalidating a marriage.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1, 77 Stat. 560
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-110, § 4, 57 DCR 27

Cross References

Voidable marriages, grounds, see § 46-402.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-903.
1973 Ed., § 16-903.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 18-110 substituted “46-401.01” for “ 46-401”.